Utah statutes.
10-8-85.7.   Implements of husbandry tracking debris onto municipal roads.

A municipality may not prohibit or punish the tracking of dirt, mud, or other debris onto a municipal road resulting from the operation of an implement of husbandry if the operation of the implement of husbandry is consistent with accepted agricultural practices.



Enacted by Chapter 214, 2006 General Session

